Arkansas, session 2025, HB1805.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-514(b)(2)(A), concerning the
definition of "bullying" as it pertains to school antibullying policies, is
amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) “Bullying” means the intentional harassment,
intimidation, humiliation, ridicule, defamation, or threat or incitement of
violence by a student against another student or public school employee by a
written, verbal, electronic, or physical act that may:
(i) May address an attribute of the other student,
public school employee, or person with whom the other student or public
school employee is associated and that causes or creates actual or reasonably
*TNL245*
03/11/2025 3:01:17 PM TNL245

HB1805
foreseeable:;
(ii) Involves an actual or reasonably perceived
power imbalance;
(iii) Is repeated or has a high likelihood of
repetition; and
(iv) Causes or creates actual or reasonably
foreseeable:
(i)(a) Physical harm to a public school
employee or student or damage to the public school employee's or student's
property;
(ii)(b) Substantial interference with a
student's education or with a public school employee's role in education;
(iii)(c) A hostile educational environment for
one (1) or more students or public school employees due to the severity,
persistence, or pervasiveness of the act; or
(iv)(d) Substantial disruption of the orderly
operation of the public school or educational environment.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-18-514, concerning school antibullying
policies, is amended to add additional subsections to read as follows:
(m) To prevent multiple, simultaneous investigations into the same
alleged conduct, if the facts that support an alleged incident of bullying
under this section may also constitute a violation of another state law or
rule or federal law or regulation, nothing in this section shall be construed
to prevent a public school or public school district from investigating and
disposing of the alleged incident of bullying in accordance with the other
applicable state law or rule or federal law or regulation in lieu of the
requirements of this section.
(n) A public school or public school district shall complete the
manner of process or investigation selected by the public school or public
school district under subsection (m) of this section.
(o) This section does not excuse a public school or public school
district from complying with applicable obligations under federal law or
regulations or state law or rules.


03/11/2025 3:01:17 PM TNL245